Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2204
Applicant, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-2201 to 44-2221, applicant shall be deemed to include all of the officers, directors, and shareholders.

Laws 1969, c. 358, § 4, p. 1262;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 193.